Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-454
Howard's Day; observance in all state penal and reformatory institutions.

The second day of September in each year, the birthday of John Howard, the author of prison reform throughout the world, shall be observed as a legal holiday in all the penal and reformatory institutions of this state and shall be known as "Howard's Day".

Laws 1911, c. 135, § 1, p. 447;

R.S.1913, § 7352;

C.S.1922, § 7012;

C.S.1929, § 83-950;

R.S.1943, § 83-454.